District of Columbia statutes.
7-871.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Childhood Lead Poisoning Screening and Reporting Act of 2002”.

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 2001, 49 DCR 6968
2001 Ed., § 7-1031.
For temporary (90 day) addition of sections, see §§ 2 to 6 of Childhood Lead Poisoning Screening and Reporting Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-379, June 3, 2002, 49 DCR 5301).
For temporary (90 day) addition of sections, see §§ 2 to 6 of Childhood Lead Poisoning Screening and Reporting Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-417, July 17, 2002, 49 DCR 7387).